California statutes. Corporations Code
(2) Where a proxy would be valid under the prior nonprofit law but would not be valid for a public benefit corporation under the new Public Benefit Corporation Law, for a mutual benefit corporation under the new Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, or for a religious corporation under the new Religious Corporation Law, and where the proxy by its terms expires during or after 1980, such proxy may be voted at meetings of members during 1980 (prior to its expiration date) but not thereafter.

(3) Action taken by the board or the members after December 31, 1979, and before January 1, 1982, shall be valid if such action was taken in compliance with the prior nonprofit law and the articles and bylaws as they then existed, subject to the rights of any person who acted in detrimental reliance upon the invalidity of such action prior to Janaury 1, 1982. This subdivision does not validate any provision in the articles or bylaws after December 31, 1981, which does not comply with the then existing provisions of the new public benefit, mutual benefit, or religious corporation law, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 587, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

9921.

Section 5710 of the new public benefit corporation law applies to actions commenced on or after January 1, 1980, with respect to a public benefit corporation, and Section 7710 of the new mutual benefit corporation law applies to actions commenced on or after January 1, 1980, with respect to a mutual benefit corporation. The prior nonprofit law governs actions commenced prior to but still pending on January 1, 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9922.

Chapters 9 (commencing with Section 5910) and 10 (commencing with Section 6010) of the new public benefit corporation law apply to transactions consummated on or after January 1, 1980, by a public benefit corporation or, subject to Sections 9630 and 9640, by a religious corporation, and Chapters 9 (commencing with Section 7910) and 10 (commencing with Section 8010) of the new mutual benefit corporation law apply to transactions consummated on or after January 1, 1980, by a mutual benefit corporation, unless the approval required by the prior nonprofit law has been given prior to January 1, 1980, or has been given on or after January 1, 1980, but at a meeting of members initially called for a date prior to January 1, 1980, in which case the transaction shall be governed by the prior nonprofit law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9923.

Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 6510) and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) of the new public benefit corporation law apply to acts for involuntary dissolution of a public benefit corporation commenced on or after January 1, 1980, and Chapters 15 (commencing with Section 8510) and 17 (commencing with Section 8710) of the new mutual benefit corporation law apply to acts for involuntary dissolution of a mutual benefit corporation commenced on or after January 1, 1980; but the prior nonprofit law governs any such actions commenced prior to but still pending on January 1, 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9924.

Chapters 16 (commencing with Section 6610) and 17 (commencing with Section 6710) of the new public benefit corporation law apply to any voluntary dissolution proceeding initiated with respect to a public benefit corporation or, subject to Section 9680, with respect to a religious corporation, by the filing on or after January 1, 1980, of an election to wind up and dissolve, and Chapters 16 (commencing with Section 8610) and 17 (commencing with Section 8710) of the new mutual benefit corporation law apply to any voluntary dissolution proceeding initiated with respect to a mutual benefit corporation by the filing on or after January 1, 1980, of an election to wind up and dissolve; but the prior nonprofit law governs any such proceeding so initiated prior to January 1, 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9925.

When any corporate agent for service of process has been designated prior to January 1, 1980, and such designation of agent included a name of a city, town or village wherein the corporate agent maintained an office, service on such agent may be effected at any office of the agent set forth in the certificate of the corporate agent filed pursuant to Section 6213 of the new public benefit corporation law (applicable to public benefit corporations and, subject to Section 9660, to religious corporations), Section 8213 of the new mutual benefit corporation law, Section 1505 of the Corporations Code, or filed pursuant to Section 3301.5, 3301.6, 6403.5, or 6403.6 of the Corporations Code as in effect prior to January 1, 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9926.

Any subject corporation that existed on the first day of January, 1873, and was formed under the laws of this state, which corporation has not already elected to continue its existence under the prior nonprofit law, may at any time elect to continue its existence under the provisions of this code applicable thereto by the unanimous vote of all its directors, or such election may be made at any annual meeting of the members, or at any meeting called by the directors especially for considering the subject, if voted by members representing a majority of the voting power, or may be made by the directors upon the written consent of that number of the members.

A certificate of the action of
 the directors, signed by them and their secretary, when the election is made by their unanimous votes or upon the written consent of the members, or a certificate of the proceedings of the meeting of the members when the election is made at any such meeting, signed by the chairperson and secretary of the meeting and a majority of the directors, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, and thereafter the corporation continues its existence under the provisions of this code which are applicable thereto, and possesses all the rights, and powers, and is subject to all the obligations, restrictions, and limitations prescribed thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 72.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9927.

If the corporate rights, privileges and powers of a corporation have been suspended and are still suspended immediately prior to January 1, 1980, pursuant to the prior nonprofit law as a result of its incorporation of Sections 5700 through 5908 of the prior law (Section 2300), such sections and provisions continue to apply to such a corporation until restoration by the Controller pursuant to such sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9928.

(a) A corporation which was organized prior to January 1, 1971, under any statutory provisions other than the General Corporation Law as then in effect (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1 of the Corporations Code or predecessor statutory provisions), has never filed a statement pursuant to Section 6210 or 8210, has never filed a statement pursuant to former Section 3301 and is not under suspension by the Franchise Tax Board, shall be subject to suspension by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section.

(b) Prior to taking action to suspend, the Secretary of State shall, in accordance with Section 6061 of the Government Code, publish a notice one time in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the articles require the principal office of the corporation to be located. The notice shall identify the corporation by name and corporate number and shall state that the corporation shall be subject to suspension without further notice if a statement pursuant to Section 6210 or 8210 is not filed within 60 days after the date of publication of the notice.

(c) Not less than 61 days and not more than 180 days after the date of the publication, the Secretary of State may act to suspend the corporation in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) The Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the suspension and thereupon, except for the purpose of amending the articles to set forth a new name, the corporate powers, rights, and privileges of the corporation are suspended.

(e) A statement pursuant to Section 6210 or 8210 may be filed notwithstanding suspension of the corporate powers, rights and privileges pursuant to this section or Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Upon the filing of a statement pursuant to Section 6210 or 8210 by a corporation which has suffered suspension pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall certify that fact to the Franchise Tax Board and the corporation may thereupon, in accordance with Section 23305a of the Revenue and Taxation Code, be relieved from suspension unless the corporation is held in suspension by the Franchise Tax Board by reason of Section 23301, 23301.5, or 23775 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 440, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 6. CORPORATIONS SOLE [10000. - 10015.]

10000.

The provisions of this part apply to all corporations sole organized either before or after March 30, 1878, whether or not the corporations organized before have elected to continue their existence under the Civil Code or elect to continue their existence under this code, except that Sections 10002, and 10012 to 10015, inclusive, do not apply to corporations sole formed before March 30, 1878, unless they have elected to continue their existence under the Civil Code or under this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

Any corporation sole formed prior to March 30, 1878, and existing under the laws of this State may elect to continue its existence under this part by filing a certificate to that effect, under its corporate seal, if any, signed by its chief officer, or by filing amended articles of incorporation in the form required in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

A corporation sole may be formed under this part by the bishop, chief priest, presiding elder, or other presiding officer of any religious denomination, society, or church, for the purpose of administering and managing the affairs, property, and temporalities thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

The articles of incorporation shall state:

(a) The name of the corporation.

(b) That the officer forming the corporation is duly authorized by the rules, regulations, or discipline of the religious denomination, society, or church to take such action.

(c) The county in this State where the principal office for the transaction of the business of the corporation is located.

(d) The manner in which any vacancy occurring in
 the office of the bishop, chief priest, presiding elder, or other presiding officer is required to be filled by the rules, regulations, or constitution of the denomination, society, or church.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

The articles of incorporation may state any desired provision for the regulation of the affairs of the corporation in a manner not in conflict with law, including restrictions upon the power to amend all or any part of the articles of incorporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

The articles shall be signed and verified by the bishop, chief priest, presiding elder, or other presiding officer forming the corporation and shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for filing in his office. If they conform to law he shall file them and endorse the date of filing thereon. Upon the filing of the articles with the Secretary of State the corporation sole is formed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

Every corporation sole may:

(a) Sue and be sued, and defend, in all courts and places, in all matters and proceedings whatever.

(b) Contract in the same manner and to the same extent as a natural person, for the purposes of the trust.

(c) Borrow money, and give promissory notes therefor, and secure the payment thereof by mortgage or other lien upon property, real or personal.

(d) Buy, sell, lease, mortgage, and in every
 way deal in real and personal property in the same manner that a natural person may, without the order of any court.

(e) Receive bequests and devises for its own use or upon trusts to the same extent as natural persons may, subject, however, to the laws regulating the transfer of property by will.

(f) Appoint attorneys in fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

Every corporation sole has perpetual existence and also has continuity of existence, notwithstanding vacancies in the incumbency thereof. During the period of any such vacancy, the corporation sole has the same capacity and right to receive and take any gift, bequest, devise, or conveyance of property, either as grantee for its own use, or as trustee, and to be or be made the beneficiary of a trust, as though there were no vacancy. No agency created by a corporation sole by a written instrument which in express terms provides that the agency thereby created shall not be terminated by a vacancy in the incumbency of the corporation is terminated or affected by the death of the
 incumbent of the corporation or by a vacancy in the incumbency thereof, however caused.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10009.

Any judge of the superior court in the county in which a corporation sole has its principal office shall at all times have access to the books of the corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10010.

The chief officer of a corporation sole may at any time amend the articles of incorporation of the corporation changing its name, the term of its existence, its territorial jurisdiction, or the manner of filling any vacancy in the office thereof, and may by amended articles of incorporation make provision for any act or thing for which provision is authorized in original articles of incorporation of corporations sole.

The chief officer of the corporation shall sign and verify a statement setting forth the provisions of the amendment and stating that it has been duly authorized by the religious organization governed by the corporation.

The amendment shall
 include the Secretary of State entity number and be submitted to the Secretary of State’s office for filing. If it conforms to law, the Secretary shall file it and endorse the date of filing thereon. Thereupon the articles are amended in the manner set forth in the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 361, Sec. 8.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10012.

A corporation sole may be dissolved and its affairs wound up voluntarily by filing with the Secretary of State a declaration of dissolution executed, signed, and verified by the chief officer of the corporation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10013.

The declaration of dissolution shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The name and entity number of the corporation as they exist on the Secretary of State’s records.

(b) The reason for its dissolution or winding up.

(c) That dissolution of the corporation has been duly authorized by the religious
 organization governed by the corporation sole.

(d) The names and addresses of the persons who are to supervise the winding up of the affairs of the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 361, Sec. 9.   (SB 522)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10014.

The declaration shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for filing in his office. If it conforms to law he shall file it and endorse the date of filing thereon. Thereupon the corporation shall cease to carry on business, except for the purpose of adjusting and winding up its affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 662, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.

After the debts and obligations of the corporation are paid or adequately provided for, any assets remaining shall be transferred to the religious organization governed by the corporation sole, or to trustees in its behalf, or disposed of as may be decreed by the superior court of the county in which the dissolved corporation had its principal office upon petition therefor by the Attorney General or any person connected with the organization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 7. CORPORATIONS FOR CHARITABLE OR ELEEMOSYNARY PURPOSES [10200. - 10200.]

10200.

Every corporation organized or existing under Part 3 (commencing with Section 10200) of Division 2 in effect on December 31, 1979, is subject to and deemed to be a nonprofit public benefit corporation organized for charitable purposes under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of the Nonprofit Corporation Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of this title) except if the corporation is organized primarily or exclusively for religious purposes, in which case it is subject to and deemed to be a nonprofit religious corporation under Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110) of the Nonprofit Corporation Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 8. TRUST FUNDS [10250. - 10251.]

10250.

(a) Any corporation organized under the provisions of or for the purposes set forth in Part 6 (commencing with Section 10000) of this division or organized on or prior to December 31, 1979, under the provisions of or for purposes set forth in Part 3 (commencing with Section 10200) of this division, then in effect, or organized under or subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110), or organized under or subject to Part 4 (commencing with Section 9110), may, if authorized so to do by its articles of incorporation, establish one or more common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to such corporation or to any church, parish, congregation, society, chapel, mission, religious, beneficial, charitable or educational institution affiliated with it, or to any organization, society or corporation holding funds or property for the benefit of any of the foregoing, or holding funds for the purpose of supporting a bishop, priest, religious pastor, or teacher or any building or buildings used by or owned by any of the foregoing, whether holding such funds or property as fiduciary or otherwise. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law in any way limiting the right of any of the foregoing or the officers or directors thereof, as fiduciary or otherwise, to invest funds held by them, it shall be lawful for any of the foregoing to invest any or all of their funds or property in shares or interests of such common trust fund or trust funds; provided, that, in the case of funds or property held as fiduciary, such investment is not prohibited by the wording of the will, deed or other instrument creating such fiduciary relationship.

(b) The directors or trustees of any such common trust fund, or trust funds, so organized, may employ such officers or agents as they think best, define their duties, and fix their compensation. They may also appoint a trust company or bank as custodian of the trust estate and may employ an investment adviser or advisers, define their duties, and fix their compensation. Securities which constitute part or all of the trust estate may be deposited in a securities depository, as defined in Section 30004 of the Financial Code, which is licensed under Section 30200 of the Financial Code or exempted from licensing thereunder by Section 30005 or 30006 of the Financial Code, and such securities may be held by such securities depository in the manner authorized by Section 775 of the Financial Code.

(c) The directors or trustees of any such common trust fund, or trust funds, shall pay ratably among the holders of shares or beneficial certificates then outstanding, semiannual dividends which shall approximately equal, in each fiscal year, the net income of the trust, or trusts.

(d) The provisions of the Corporate Securities Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4) shall not apply to the creation, administration, or termination of common trust funds created hereunder, nor to participation therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 570, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

10251.

(a) “Educational institution,” as used in this section, means any nonprofit corporation organized under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 94400) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 94700) of Part 59 of the Education Code or organized under Part 1 (commencing with Section 9000) of this division in effect on December 31, 1979, and designated on or after January 1, 1980, as a nonprofit public benefit corporation, or organized for charitable or eleemosynary purposes under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of this division, or Part 3 (commencing with Section 10200) of this division in effect on December 31, 1979, and designated on or after January 1, 1980, as a nonprofit public benefit corporation for the purpose of establishing, conducting or maintaining an institution offering courses beyond high school and issuing or conferring a diploma or for the purpose of offering or conducting private school instruction on the high school or elementary school level and any charitable trust organized for such purpose or purposes. “Educational institution,” as used in this section, also means the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and any auxiliary organization, as defined in Section 89901 of the Education Code, established for the purpose of receiving gifts, property and funds to be used for the benefit of a state college.

(b) It shall be lawful for any educational institution to become a member of a nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of any state for the purpose of maintaining a common trust fund or similar common fund in which nonprofit organizations may commingle their funds and property for investment and to invest any and all of its funds, whenever and however acquired, in the common fund or funds; provided that, in the case of funds or property held as fiduciary, the investment is not prohibited by the wording of the will, deed, or other instrument creating the fiduciary relationship.

(c) An educational institution electing to invest in a common fund or funds under this section may elect to receive distributions from each fund in an amount not to exceed for each fiscal year the greater of the income, as determined under the Uniform Principal and Income Act, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16320) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Probate Code, accrued on its interest in the fund or 10 percent of the value of its interest in the fund as of the last day of its next preceding fiscal year. The educational institution may expend the distribution or distributions for any lawful purpose notwithstanding any general or special law characterizing the distribution, or any part thereof, as principal or income; provided that, in the case of funds or property invested as fiduciary, the expenditure is not prohibited by the wording of the will, deed, or other instrument creating the fiduciary relationship. No such prohibition of expenditure shall be deemed to exist solely because a will, deed, or other instrument, whether executed or in effect before or after the effective date of this section, directs or authorizes the use of only the “income,” or “interest,” or “dividends” or “rents, issues or profits,” or contains words of similar import.

(d) The Corporate Securities Law of 1968 shall not apply to the creation, administration, or termination of common trust funds authorized under this section, or to participation therein.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 9. SOCIETIES FOR PREVENTION OF CRUELTY TO ANIMALS [10400. - 10406.]

10400.

Corporations for the prevention of cruelty to animals may be formed under the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110)) by 20 or more persons, who shall be citizens and residents of this state. If the corporation is formed on or after January 1, 2011, its articles of incorporation shall specifically state that the corporation is being formed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 43.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

Every such corporation may take by gift, purchase, devise, or bequest, any property, real or personal, and hold it or dispose thereof at its pleasure; but no such corporation shall hold real property the annual income of which exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1038.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.

Any such corporation, or humane officer thereof, may proffer a complaint against any person, before any court or magistrate having jurisdiction, for the violation of any law relating to or affecting animals and may aid in the prosecution of the offender before the court or magistrate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 44.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.

All magistrates, sheriffs, and officers of police shall, as occasion may require, aid any such corporation, its officers, members, and agents, in the enforcement of all laws relating to or affecting animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 652, Sec. 5.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

This part applies to all corporations for the prevention of cruelty to animals, whether formed prior to or after May 20, 1905, but does not apply to any association, society, or corporation that uses or specifies a name or style the same, or substantially the same, as that of any previously existing society or corporation in this state organized for a like purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.   (SB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 10. PORT AND TERMINAL PROTECTION AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS [10700. - 10703.]

10700.

As used in this part, “public agency” includes every port district, river port district, municipal port district, harbor district, harbor improvement district, joint harbor improvement district, Board of State Harbor Commissioners, board of harbor commissioners, city, county, and city and county in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10701.

Every public agency owning or operating any port or marine terminal and every public agency organized for such purposes may associate itself with other public agencies, private corporations or individuals owning or operating, or organized for the purpose of owning or operating, ports or marine terminals located on the same harbor, bay, or other waterway or on communicating or related waterways, of this state and with other public agencies and with private corporations and individuals, or any of them, in the formation under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division, and may become and remain a member of a nonprofit corporation organized under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law for the purpose of, or the principal powers and purposes of which include carrying on a program of nonregulatory activities in the common interests of its members, including but not limited to any or all of the following activities: studies and research into traffic conditions, cargo volume, rate structures, cost factors, commercial transportation practices, and similar fields; the acquisition and dissemination of information relative to the said and similar subjects; the representation of the common interests of its members before federal, state, and local legislative and administrative authorities; and service as a facility for the cooperation of its members and the coordination of their activities toward the maintenance and improvement of the commercial welfare and competitive position of the ports and terminals owned or operated by its members, the maintenance of equitable and nondiscriminatory rate structures, and the elimination of inequitable, unfair, or discriminatory trade practices adversely affecting the interests of its members; and the undertaking or coordination of any other program of related activities or in related fields for the mutual benefit of its members as may be desired by the membership. Every such public agency may pay the dues and assessments required of its members by such nonprofit mutual benefit corporation out of any funds available to it for that purpose or for its support; may make contracts; may enter into agreements; may appoint an individual as its representative to such nonprofit mutual benefit corporation to exercise the voting power of such public agency and to act in its behalf with respect to such nonprofit mutual benefit corporation; and may do or perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this part; but no public agency shall become or remain a member of any such nonprofit mutual benefit corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the nonprofit mutual benefit corporation include at all times a provision limiting the liability of members to assessments to a specified or ascertainable amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

For the purposes of this part, of the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, and of the General Corporation Law of this state, every public agency and private corporation qualifying under this part shall be deemed to be a “person” and shall have the legal capacity to act as incorporator and as member of any nonprofit mutual benefit corporation formed under the provisions of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

If, when, and during such times as public agencies or individuals duly authorized to represent them and act in their behalf constitute a majority of the incorporators or of the directors and are entitled to exercise a majority of the voting power of a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation pursuant to this part:

(a) The Corporate Securities Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4) shall not apply to memberships nor to membership certificates issued by the corporation; and

(b) The corporation shall be exempt from payment of any taxes under the Bank and Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), except as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 4 thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 11. NONPROFIT MEDICAL, HOSPITAL, OR LEGAL SERVICES CORPORATIONS [10810. - 10841.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nonprofit Corporations for Medical Services [10810. - 10812.]

10810.

A nonprofit corporation may be formed under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division for the purposes of defraying or assuming the cost of professional services of licentiates under any chapter of Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code or of rendering any such services, but it may not engage directly or indirectly in the performance of the corporate purposes or objects unless all of the following requirements are met:

(a) At least one-fourth of all licentiates of the particular profession residing in California become members.

(b) Membership in the corporation and an opportunity to render professional services upon a uniform basis are available to all licensed members of the particular profession.

(c) Voting by proxy and cumulative voting are prohibited.

(d) A certificate is issued to the corporation by the particular professional board whose licentiates have become members, finding compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

Any such corporation shall be subject to supervision by the particular professional board under which its members are licensed and shall also be subject to the part under which it is formed, either Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division, except as to matters specifically otherwise provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10811.

Any nonprofit corporation described in Section 10810 which defrays or assumes some portion or all of the costs of refractions or eye appliances shall offer an equal opportunity to render professional services upon a uniform basis to all licentiates expressly authorized by law to render such services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10812.

The provisions of Sections 10810 and 10811 of this article apply to corporations formed on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 2 or Part 3 of this division and pursuant to this article and to corporations existing on December 31, 1979, and formed under Section 9201 or 9201.1 of the Corporations Code then in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Nonprofit Health Care Service Plans [10820. - 10821.]

10820.

(a) “Health care service plan,” as used in this section means a corporation which is a health care service plan defined in the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), other than a corporation which is exempted from that act by subdivision (d) of Section 1343 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(b) A health care service plan may be formed under or subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of this division or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10821.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, as to a health care service plan which is formed under or subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division, all references to the Attorney General contained in Part 2 or Part 3 of this division shall, in the case of health care service plans, be deemed to refer to the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nonprofit Corporation to Administer System of Defraying Cost of Professional Services of Attorneys [10830. - 10831.]

10830.

A nonprofit corporation may be formed under Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division for the purposes of administering a system or systems of defraying the cost of professional services of attorneys, but any such corporation may not engage directly or indirectly in the performance of the corporate purposes or objects unless all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The attorneys furnishing professional services pursuant to such system or systems are acting in compliance with the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar of California concerning such system or systems.

(b) Membership in the corporation and an opportunity to render professional services upon a uniform basis are available to all active members of the State Bar.

(c) Voting by proxy and cumulative voting are prohibited.

(d) A certificate is issued to the corporation by the State Bar of California, finding compliance with the requirements of subdivisions (a), (b) and (c).

Any such corporation shall be subject to supervision by the State Bar of California and shall also be subject to Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division except as to matters specifically otherwise provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------

10831.

The provisions of this article apply to corporations formed on or after January 1, 1980, under Part 3 of this division and pursuant to this article and to corporations existing on December 31, 1979, and formed under Section 9201.2 of the Corporations Code then in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hospital Service Plans [10840. - 10841.]

10840.

(a) “Hospital service plan,” as used in this section means a corporation which is a nonprofit hospital service plan defined in Chapter 11a (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(b) A hospital service plan may be formed under or subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 14.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, as to a hospital service plan which is formed under or subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) or Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of this division, all references to the Attorney General contained in Part 2 or Part 3 of this division shall, in the case of hospital service plans, be deemed to refer to the Insurance Commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1085, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 3. CORPORATIONS FOR SPECIFIC PURPOSES [12000. - 14707.]



  PART 1. CHAMBERS OF COMMERCE, BOARDS OF TRADE, MECHANICS' INSTITUTES, ETC. [12000. - 12000.]

12000.

Every corporation organized or existing under Part 1 (commencing with Section 12000) in effect on December 31, 1979, is subject to and deemed to be organized under:

(a) The General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of this title), if the corporation is organized with capital stock.

(b) The Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of this title) if the corporation is organized without capital stock.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1305.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 2. COOPERATIVE CORPORATIONS [12200. - 12704.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions, Organization and Bylaws [12200. - 12340.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title, Purposes and Application of Part [12200. - 12203.]

12200.
